Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1356.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Community land trusts study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The community land trusts study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. One member who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 2. One member who is appointed by the president of the senate. 3. One member who is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. 4. One member who is appointed by the minority leader of the senate. 5. Two additional members who are appointed by the four members appointed pursuant to paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection as follows: (a) One member who is a community land trust practitioner. (b) One member who represents an institution of higher education in this state. B. The members of the study committee shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among the study committee's membership. C. The members of the study committee are not eligible to receive reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The study committee shall study the economic and developmental barriers to developing community land trusts and shall determine potential solutions to these economic and developmental barriers. E. On or before December 31, 2026, the study committee shall submit a report regarding the study committee's activities and recommendations on solutions to the economic and developmental barriers to developing community land trusts.  The study committee shall submit the report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. F. This section is repealed from and after June 20, 2027.